Washington statutes.
RCW 15.130.210

Misbranded food prohibited.

(1) A person may not:

(a) Cause or intend to cause misbranded food in intrastate commerce;

(b) Sell, process, or store misbranded food in intrastate commerce; or

(c) Receive for the purpose of sale in intrastate commerce food known to be misbranded.

(2) Food is misbranded if it is misbranded within the meaning of 21 U.S.C. Sec. 321(n) or 21 U.S.C. Sec. 343, falsely represents its place or origin, or is not labeled and packaged in accordance with department rules.

[ 2018 c 236 s 202.]